North Dakota statutes. TITLE 50 Public Welfare
CHAPTER 50-11.1 Early Childhood Services
50-11.1-16.
Self-declaration — Approved application required — Fees.

An application for self-declaration is voluntary. If an individual applies for self-declaration from the department, the department or the department’s authorized agent shall determine whether the standards for self-declaration have been met and shall approve or deny a self-declaration based upon that determination.

An applicant for self-declaration shall pay a nonrefundable fee of fifteen dollars at the time the application is filed.

An applicant for self-declaration, who currently holds a license or self-declaration, shall submit the nonrefundable fees with the application at least sixty days and no more than ninety days before the expiration date of the applicant’s current license or self-declaration. If the nonrefundable fees and application are submitted less than sixty days before expiration of the applicant’s current license or self-declaration, the applicant shall submit with the application two times the regular nonrefundable fees.

All fees collected under this section must be paid to the department or the department’s authorized agent and must be used to defray the cost of investigating, inspecting, and evaluating applications for self-declarations or to provide training to providers of early childhood services.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 422, § 8; 2017, ch. 348, § 10, effective January 1, 2018.

Effective Date.

This section became effective July 1, 2009.

50-11.1-17.
Application for self-declaration — Prerequisites for approval — Approval — Term.

Applications for self-declarations must be made on forms provided and in the manner prescribed by the department. The department or the department’s authorized agent shall investigate the applicant and every individual living in the private residence and shall conduct a background check. The department or the department’s authorized agent shall conduct the investigation in accordance with the rules adopted by the department and shall determine whether any of them has a criminal record or has had a finding of services required for child abuse or neglect filed against them. Except as otherwise provided, the department shall approve a self-declaration within thirty days of receipt of a completed application and all supporting documents by the department and upon the applicant’s declaration:

The premises to be used are in fit and sanitary condition to provide for the health and safety of all children and are maintained according to the standards prescribed by the rules of the department;

The applicant is able to provide for the health and safety of each child receiving early childhood services from the applicant according to this chapter and standards prescribed by the department as set forth in the rules of the department;

The applicant has not had a previous license or self-declaration denied or revoked within the twelve months before the date of the current application;

The applicant has not had three or more previous licenses or self-declarations denied or revoked. The most recent revocation or denial may not have occurred within five years of the application date;

The applicant has paid the required application fees;

The applicant has paid any penalties and sanctions assessed against the program required by sections 50-11.1-03 and 50-11.1-07.4;

The applicant is currently certified in infant and pediatric cardiopulmonary resuscitation, including the use of an automated external defibrillator by the American heart association, the American red cross, or a similar cardiopulmonary resuscitation and automated external defibrillator training program approved by the department;

The emergency designee used by the applicant, if any, is currently certified in infant and pediatric cardiopulmonary resuscitation, including the use of an automated external defibrillator by the American heart association, the American red cross, or a similar cardiopulmonary resuscitation and automated external defibrillator training program approved by the department;

The applicant is currently certified in first aid through a training program approved by the department; and

The application and supporting documents do not include any fraudulent or untrue representations.

The department may consider the early childhood services history of the applicant in determining issuance of a self-declaration document.

The department may issue a provisional self-declaration document in accordance with the rules of the department. The department shall consider issuing a provisional or restricted self-declaration document before revoking a self-declaration document. The department may require the holder of a self-declaration to provide a compliance plan to address compliance issues with this chapter and rules of the department. The department shall review the compliance plan before issuing a provisional or restricted self-declaration document. The department shall approve the provisional self-declaration document if the department approves the compliance plan. The department may revoke a self-declaration document if the holder of a self-declaration fails to comply with the department approved compliance plan or for any additional violations of this chapter or rules of the department.

The department shall notify the holder of a self-declaration that the holder of a self-declaration is required to post a notice of late application at the self-declaration premises if the department has not received a completed application and all supporting documents for licensure or self-declaration renewal at least thirty days before the expiration date of a self-declaration.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 422, § 9; 2015, ch. 339, § 6, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 348, § 11, effective January 1, 2018; 2019, ch. 406, § 7, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 407, § 3, effective August 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 6 of chapter 339, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

This section became effective July 1, 2009.

Note.

Section 50-11.1-17 was amended 2 times by the 2019 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 7 of Chapter 406, Session Laws 2019, Senate Bill 2245; and Section 3 of Chapter 407, Session Laws 2019, Senate Bill 2043.

50-11.1-18.
Early childhood services inclusion support services and grant program. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The department may establish in collaboration with the department of commerce an early childhood services inclusion grant program for early childhood services providers that provide, or applicants for licensure who indicate they will provide, care for children with disabilities or developmental delays. The grant program must be designed to:

Support the staffing needs to expand the ability to care for children with disabilities or developmental delays; and

Assist in modifying or adapting the early childhood services setting as needed to address the health, safety, and developmental needs of children with disabilities or developmental delays.

The department may fund early childhood services specialists to make available technical assistance to early childhood services providers that care for children with special needs or developmental delays. The technical assistance program must be designed to:

Assist early childhood services providers that request support and information regarding caring for children with special needs or developmental delays;

Assist early childhood services providers in adapting the program environment and care practices to meet the individual child’s needs and to build the early childhood services providers’ capacity to serve children with special needs or developmental delays;

In partnership with the child’s parents and health care provider, assist the early childhood services provider in the development or coordination of care plans for children with special needs or special health care needs relevant to the care setting;

In partnership with the child’s parents, foster communication with the team of specialists serving the child to ensure consistency in therapy practices and appropriate approaches;

Provide classroom training to early childhood services providers to assist the providers in the integration of children with special needs; and

As requested by the early childhood services providers, conduct one-on-one training at the provider’s business to assist the provider in the integration of children with special needs.

The department may establish a grant review committee to assist in the development of grant guidelines, the review of applications, and the determination of awards or denials. The membership of the grant review committee must include representation from each of the following:

The department of human services;

The department of public instruction;

The North Dakota training and information center;

Child care aware of North Dakota;

Parents of children with disabilities or at risk for developmental delays; and

Other appropriate partners.

To be eligible for the grant program, the early childhood services provider must:

Be state-licensed, self-declared, or in the process of applying for licensure;

Collaborate with service providers that provide formal supports to the child or children with disabilities or developmental delays; and

Work with the child’s family and an inclusion or health specialist to complete a care plan appropriate for the child care setting.

The department shall give priority consideration to licensed early childhood services providers that care for children with disabilities.

For purposes of this section, a child with disabilities or who is at risk for developmental delays includes any child in this state between the ages of birth and twelve years who receives support through either public or private services and includes a child who is in the process of being evaluated for public or private formal support. A child who is at risk for developmental delays includes any child between the ages of birth and twelve years who received foster care services; who has a previous substantiated history as a victim of child abuse, neglect, or domestic violence; who is homeless; who has documented special health care needs; or who has a parent with a significant disability.

The department may accept gifts, grants, and donations from any source to assist the department in the establishment and implementation of the early childhood services inclusion support services and grant program. Any gifts, grants, and donations received are appropriated to the department on a continuing basis for the purpose of funding the early childhood services inclusion support services and grant program under this section.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 361, § 1; 2015, ch. 339, § 7, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 7 of chapter 339, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

This section became effective July 1, 2011.

50-11.1-18.
Early childhood services inclusion support services and grant program. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The department may establish in collaboration with the department of commerce an early childhood services inclusion grant program for early childhood services providers that provide, or applicants for licensure who indicate they will provide, care for children with disabilities or developmental delays. The grant program must be designed to:

Support the staffing needs to expand the ability to care for children with disabilities or developmental delays; and

Assist in modifying or adapting the early childhood services setting as needed to address the health, safety, and developmental needs of children with disabilities or developmental delays.

The department may fund early childhood services specialists to make available technical assistance to early childhood services providers that care for children with special needs or developmental delays. The technical assistance program must be designed to:

Assist early childhood services providers that request support and information regarding caring for children with special needs or developmental delays;

Assist early childhood services providers in adapting the program environment and care practices to meet the individual child’s needs and to build the early childhood services providers’ capacity to serve children with special needs or developmental delays;

In partnership with the child’s parents and health care provider, assist the early childhood services provider in the development or coordination of care plans for children with special needs or special health care needs relevant to the care setting;

In partnership with the child’s parents, foster communication with the team of specialists serving the child to ensure consistency in therapy practices and appropriate approaches;

Provide classroom training to early childhood services providers to assist the providers in the integration of children with special needs; and

As requested by the early childhood services providers, conduct one-on-one training at the provider’s business to assist the provider in the integration of children with special needs.

The department may establish a grant review committee to assist in the development of grant guidelines, the review of applications, and the determination of awards or denials. The membership of the grant review committee must include representation from each of the following:

The department of health and human services;

The department of public instruction;

The North Dakota training and information center;

Child care aware of North Dakota;

Parents of children with disabilities or at risk for developmental delays; and

Other appropriate partners.

To be eligible for the grant program, the early childhood services provider must:

Be state-licensed, self-declared, or in the process of applying for licensure;

Collaborate with service providers that provide formal supports to the child or children with disabilities or developmental delays; and

Work with the child’s family and an inclusion or health specialist to complete a care plan appropriate for the child care setting.

The department shall give priority consideration to licensed early childhood services providers that care for children with disabilities.

For purposes of this section, a child with disabilities or who is at risk for developmental delays includes any child in this state between the ages of birth and twelve years who receives support through either public or private services and includes a child who is in the process of being evaluated for public or private formal support. A child who is at risk for developmental delays includes any child between the ages of birth and twelve years who received foster care services; who has a previous substantiated history as a victim of child abuse, neglect, or domestic violence; who is homeless; who has documented special health care needs; or who has a parent with a significant disability.

The department may accept gifts, grants, and donations from any source to assist the department in the establishment and implementation of the early childhood services inclusion support services and grant program. Any gifts, grants, and donations received are appropriated to the department on a continuing basis for the purpose of funding the early childhood services inclusion support services and grant program under this section.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 361, § 1; 2015, ch. 339, § 7, effective August 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 352, § 423, effective September 1, 2022.

50-11.1-19.
Play area regulation.

If a facility licensed under this chapter has sufficient indoor recreation space, the department may not require outdoor play space.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 376, § 3.

Effective Date.

This section became effective July 1, 2013.

50-11.1-20.
Staffing requirements. [Expired]

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 376, § 4; Expired under S.L. 2013, ch. 376, § 10.

50-11.1-21.
Four-year old program — Approval.

Any person or school district operating or seeking to operate a four-year old program may request approval for a two-year period of the four-year old program from the department. The department shall approve a four-year old program if the program:

Is taught by individuals licensed to teach in early childhood education by the education standards and practices board or approved to teach in early childhood education by the education standards and practices board;

Follows four-year old program requirements approved by the department;

Is in compliance with all municipal and state health, fire, and safety requirements;

Limits enrollment to children who have reached the age of four years old before August first in the year of enrollment;

Submits a nonrefundable fee of fifty dollars at the time the application is filed. All fees collected under this section must be paid to the department and must be used to defray the cost of investigating, inspecting, and evaluating applications for approval; and

Is in compliance with this chapter.

In determining the state aid payments to which a school district is entitled, the superintendent of public instruction may not count a student enrolled in a regular four-year old program.

The department may investigate and inspect a four-year old program applicant or four-year old program and the conditions of the premises and the qualifications of current and prospective staff. The department may use the findings of the investigation and inspection to determine approval.

The department may revoke the four-year old program upon proper showing that:

Any applicable conditions as prerequisites for the issuance of the approval no longer exist.

The program is no longer in compliance with the minimum standards prescribed by the department.

The program approval was issued upon fraudulent or untrue presentation.

The program has violated any rules of the department.

If an action to revoke a four-year old program approval is appealed, the provider may continue the operation of the program pending the final administrative determination or until the approval expires, whichever occurs first.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 358, § 7, effective July 1, 2021.

50-11.1-22.
Early childhood grant for best in class four–year old experiences. [Expires July 1, 2025]

A four-year old program deemed eligible under section 50-11.1-23 may submit an application for the best in class four-year old experiences grant. An approved program is eligible for an annual award of one hundred twenty thousand dollars per approved group size. The grant award must be matched with no less than twenty thousand dollars in other funds. The department shall assign a program support coach to each approved program. An approved program:

Shall utilize the assigned support coach and utilize the sliding fee scale for parent fees, as established by the department.

May use grant funds to support the provision of quality early childhood experiences, including expenditures related to staffing, training, equipment, and supplies.

May not use grant funds for construction or rehabilitation. An approved program must enter a grant agreement with the department.

The department may not collect equipment or supplies purchased with grant funds from the approved program after successful completion of the term of the grant.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 368, § 2, effective August 1, 2021.

50-11.1-23.
Eligibility for best in class four-year old experiences grant.
[Expires July 1, 2025]

A four-year old program may submit, in the form and manner prescribed by the department, an application to the department for a grant under section 50-11.1-22, if the provider certifies to the department the provider:

Operates a four-year old program in this state;

Operates a four-year old program for children who have reached four years of age before August first in the year of enrollment;

Operates a four-year old program that has a duration of at least four hundred hours over a period of at least thirty-two consecutive weeks;

Incorporates within the four-year old program at least ten hours of research-based family engagement;

Has been determined to meet the standards and expectations of no less than step three in the North Dakota early childhood quality improvement system;

Is willing to admit children of all learning abilities into the four-year old program;

Is willing to admit children who receive assistance from the child care assistance program into the four-year old program; and

Is willing to operate in compliance with the grant requirements, including:

Maintaining the recommended group size for number of children served in the four-year old program;

Complying with requirements related to qualifications, training, and professional development of staff delivering services in the four-year old program; and

Adhering to expectations established by the department related to four-year old program monitoring and oversight.

The department may distribute grants under this section to approved four-year old programs, including four-year old programs operated as early childhood programs by educational facilities or federally funded head start programs or in connection with a church, business, or organization that operates a four-year old program.

The department may recapture grant funds distributed to an approved four-year old program found by the department to be out of compliance with requirements established for the best in class four-year old experiences grant program.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 368, § 3, effective August 1, 2021.

50-11.1-24.
Grant program data collection — Requirements.
[Expires July 1, 2025]

The state agency with approval authority over four-year old programs, with the advice and consent of the department, shall implement a uniform system for the accounting, budgeting, and reporting of data by any four-year old program provider to whom or to which grants are distributed under section 50-11.1-23. Grants may be withheld or forfeited, in whole or in part, if information required in accordance with this section is not submitted at the time or in the manner requested by the state agency with approval authority over four-year old programs. A grant recipient shall consent to provide information needed to comply with data collection requirements. The state agency with approval authority over four-year old programs shall disclose the requested information to the department.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 368, § 4, effective August 1, 2021.

50-11.1-25.
North Dakota early childhood council — Membership — Terms.

The North Dakota early childhood council consists of:

A chairman appointed by the governor;

The superintendent of public instruction, or the superintendent's designee;

The state health officer, or the officer's designee;

The director of the department, or the director's designee;

The North Dakota head start-state collaboration administrator, or the administrator's designee;

The commissioner of higher education, or the commissioner's designee;

The commissioner of commerce, or the commissioner's designee;

The chairman of the senate education committee, or the chairman's designee;

The chairman of the house of representatives education committee, or the chairman's designee;

The chairman of the senate human services committee, or the chairman's designee;

The chairman of the house of representatives human services committee, or the chairman's designee; and

The following individuals appointed by the governor:

The superintendent of a school district having at least one thousand students in average daily membership;

The superintendent of a school district having fewer than one thousand students in average daily membership;

The superintendent of a school district headquartered on a reservation or including reservation land within its boundaries;

An individual representing a non-religious-based provider of a four-year old program;

An individual representing a religious-based provider of a four-year old program;

An individual representing a center-based licensed child care provider;

An individual representing a home-based licensed child care provider;

An individual representing a reservation-based head start program;

An elected member of a school board;

The parent of a child not yet enrolled in elementary school;

The parent of a child with disabilities not yet enrolled in elementary school;

An individual representing children with disabilities; and

A special education director;

The term of each member enumerated in subdivision l of subsection 1 is three years and begins on July first. The terms must be staggered by lot so four of the terms expire each year.

If at any time during a member's term the member ceases to possess the qualifications required by this section, the member's seat is deemed vacant and the governor shall appoint another qualified individual to serve for the remainder of the term.

A member may not serve more than two consecutive terms. If an individual is appointed to complete a vacancy, that service is not counted as a term, for purposes of this section, unless the duration of that service exceeds one year.

The council shall meet at least twice each year, at the call of the chairman.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 12, § 29, effective July 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 358, § 8, effective July 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 50-11.1-25 was amended 1 time by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 8 of Chapter 358, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1416; Section 29 of Chapter 12, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1012.

50-11.1-26.
North Dakota early childhood council — Duties —- Reports.

The North Dakota early childhood council shall:

Review the availability and provision of early childhood services in this state;

Identify opportunities for public and private sector collaboration in the provision of early childhood services in this state;

Identify ways to assist with the recruitment and retention of individuals interested in working as providers of early childhood services, including training and continuing education or professional development opportunities;

Seek the advice and guidance of individuals uniquely familiar with the nature, scope, and associated challenges of providing early childhood services in geographically and socioeconomically diverse settings, and develop recommendations pertaining to the short-term and longer-term improvement and expansion of early childhood services in this state; and

Provide a biennial report regarding the council's findings and recommendations to the governor and the legislative assembly.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 358, § 9, effective July 1, 2021.

50-11.1-27.
North Dakota early childhood council members — Reimbursements for expenses.

Each member of the North Dakota early childhood council is entitled to receive reimbursement for expenses as provided by law for state officers if the member is attending meetings or performing duties directed by the council. In addition, each member of the legislative assembly who serves on the council is entitled to receive compensation in the amount provided per day for members of the legislative management under section 54-35-10 for attending meetings or performing duties as directed by the council.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 358, § 10, effective July 1, 2021.